Utah statutes.
31A-22-311.   Definitions.

As used in Sections 31A-22-312 and 31A-22-314:

(1)  "Authorized driver" means the person to whom the vehicle is rented and includes:

(a)  his spouse if a licensed driver satisfying the rental company's minimum age requirement;

(b)  his employer or coworker if engaged in business activity with the renter and if they are licensed drivers satisfying the rental company's minimum age requirement;

(c)  any person who operates the vehicle during an emergency situation;

(d)  any person who operates the vehicle while parking the vehicle at a commercial establishment; or

(e)  any person expressly listed by the rental company on the rental agreement as an authorized driver.

(2)  "Damage" means any damage or loss to the rented vehicle resulting from a collision, including loss of use and any costs and expenses incident to the damage or loss.

(3)  "Rental agreement" means any written agreement stating the terms and conditions governing the use of a private passenger motor vehicle provided by a rental company.

(4)  "Rental company" means any person or organization in the business of providing private passenger motor vehicles to the public.

(5)  "Renter" means any person or organization obtaining the use of a private passenger motor vehicle from a rental company under the terms of a rental agreement.



Amended by Chapter 316, 1994 General Session

